District of Columbia statutes.
34-221

“Telephone line” defined.

The term “telephone line” when used in this subtitle includes conduits, ducts, poles, wires, cables, crossarms, receivers, transmitters, instruments, machines, and appliances, and all devices, real estate, franchises, easements, apparatus, fixtures, property, appurtenances, and routes used, operated, controlled, or owned by any telephone corporation to facilitate the business of affording telephonic communication for hire, or which licenses, lets, or permits telephonic communication.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 976, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1

Cross References

Public utility environmental impact statement, “action” defined, see § 34-2602.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-2602.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-218.
1973 Ed., § 43-118.